Maine, session 132, LD865.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3174-PPP is enacted to read:
§3174-PPP. Reimbursement for lactation services
1. Definition. For the purposes of this section, "lactation services" means educational
or consultation services related to breastfeeding.
2. Reimbursement. The department shall provide reimbursement under the
MaineCare program for lactation services provided in a hospital, clinic, office, community
or in the home for a child eligible for coverage under the MaineCare program or the
Children's Health Insurance Program established in section 3174-T. Lactation services
may be provided by a health care professional licensed under Title 32 acting within the
health care professional's authorized scope of practice or by a consultant or counselor who
is certified by a national organization that provides a national certification program in
lactation consulting or lactation counseling and is approved by the department.
3. Rulemaking. The department shall adopt rules to implement this section. Rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 2. State plan amendment. The Department of Health and Human Services
shall apply to the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services for a state plan amendment to implement the Maine
Revised Statutes, Title 22, section 3174-PPP. The state plan amendment application must
allow for Medicaid reimbursement for lactation services provided at the hospital or at the
home of eligible persons that are performed by lactation consultants certified by the
International Board of Lactation Consultant Examiners or its successor organization acting
within the scope of practice.
Sec. 3. Rulemaking. Upon approval of a state plan amendment under section 2, the
Department of Health and Human Services shall adopt or amend rules to allow for
Page 1 - 132LR1015(03)

reimbursement required pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 22, section 3174-
PPP.
Sec. 4. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides funding for MaineCare reimbursement for lactation services provided
in the home.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $12,257
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $12,257
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $19,942
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $19,942
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $546
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $0 $546
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for MaineCare technology costs and development of
rate methodology and payment model to implement MaineCare coverage of lactation
services provided in the home.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $91,993
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $91,993
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $178,901
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $178,901
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES,
DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $104,250
Page 2 - 132LR1015(03)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $0 $198,843
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND $0 $546
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $303,639
Page 3 - 132LR1015(03)